Washington statutes.
RCW 10.04.800

Proposed forms for criminal actions.

The district and municipal court judges' association may propose to the supreme court suggested forms for criminal actions for inclusion in the justice court criminal rules.

[ 1994 c 32 s 6; 1987 c 202 s 155.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CrRLJ 2.1, 4.2.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.